Nevada, session 83, AB54.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 484B.607 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484B.607 1. Upon approaching any traffic incident, the
driver of the approaching vehicle shall, in the absence of other
direction given by a law enforcement officer:
(a) Decrease the speed of the vehicle to a speed that is
reasonable and proper, pursuant to the criteria set forth in subsection
1 of NRS 484B.600;
(b) Proceed with caution;
(c) Be prepared to stop; and
(d) If possible, drive in a lane that is not adjacent to the lane or
lanes where the traffic incident is located unless roadway, traffic,
weather or other conditions make doing so unsafe or impossible.
2. [A] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a person
who violates subsection 1 is guilty of a misdemeanor.
3. If a person violates subsection 1 and the violation is the
proximate cause of the death of or substantial bodily harm to a
first responder, the person is guilty of a category B felony and
shall be punished by imprisonment in the state prison for a
minimum term of not less than 1 year and a maximum term of not
more than 6 years and by a fine of not less than $2,000 but not
more than $5,000.
4. As used in this section [, “traffic] :
(a) “Emergency medical provider” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 450B.199.
(b) “Firefighter” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 450B.071.
(c) “First responder” means a person responding to or
assisting with a traffic incident in the course of duty of his or her
profession, including, without limitation, a peace officer,
firefighter, emergency medical provider, tow car operator,
employee of a public utility, employee of the Department of
Transportation or a local government or a person contracted by
the Department of Transportation or a local government to
provide aid to motorists or to mitigate traffic incidents.
(d) “Peace officer” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 169.125.
(e) “Traffic incident” means any vehicle, person, condition or
other traffic hazard which is located on or near a roadway and which
poses a danger to the flow of traffic or to a person involved in,
responding to or assisting with the traffic hazard. The term includes,
without limitation:
-
*AB54*

– 3 –
[(a)] (1) An authorized emergency vehicle which is stopped and
is making use of flashing lights meeting the requirements of
subsection 3 of NRS 484A.480;
[(b)] (2) A tow car which is stopped and is making use of
flashing amber warning lights meeting the requirements of NRS
484B.748 or lamps that emit nonflashing blue light meeting the
requirements of NRS 484D.475, or both;
[(c)] (3) An authorized vehicle used by the Department of
Transportation which is stopped or moving at a speed slower than
the normal flow of traffic and which is making use of flashing
amber warning lights meeting the requirements of subsection 1 of
NRS 484D.185 or lamps that emit nonflashing blue light meeting
the requirements of NRS 484D.200;
[(d)] (4) A vehicle, owned or operated by a person who
contracts with the Department of Transportation to provide aid to
motorists or to mitigate traffic incidents, which is stopped or
moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic and making
use of lamps that emit nonflashing blue light meeting the
requirements of NRS 484D.200;
[(e)] (5) A public utility vehicle which is stopped or moving at
a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic and is making use of
flashing amber warning lights meeting the requirements of
NRS 484D.195;
[(f)] (6) An authorized vehicle of a local governmental agency
which is stopped or moving at a speed slower than the normal flow
of traffic and is making use of flashing amber warning lights
meeting the requirements of NRS 484D.185 or lamps that emit
nonflashing blue light meeting the requirements of NRS 484D.200;
[(g)] (7) A vehicle, owned or operated by a person who
contracts with a local governmental agency to provide aid to
motorists or to mitigate traffic incidents, which is stopped or
moving at a speed slower than the normal flow of traffic and making
use of lamps that emit nonflashing blue light meeting the
requirements of NRS 484D.200;
[(h)] (8) Any vehicle which is stopped or moving at a speed
slower than the normal flow of traffic and is making use of flashing
amber warning lights meeting the requirements of NRS 484D.185;
[(i)] (9) A crash scene;
[(j)] (10) A stalled vehicle;
[(k)] (11) Debris on the roadway; or
[(l)] (12) A person who is out of his or her vehicle attending to
a repair of the vehicle.
Sec. 2. The amendatory provisions of this act apply only to
offenses committed on or after the effective date of this act.
-
*AB54*

– 4 –
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*AB54*